Hawaii statutes.
[§266‑21.5] Biosecurity, inspection, and cargo support facilities. (a) The department of transportation shall provide space at
commercial harbors for biosecurity and inspection facilities and to facilitate
the safe and efficient movement of maritime cargo through the commercial
harbors.

(b) The department and
department of agriculture shall plan, design, and construct biosecurity,
inspection, consolidation, deconsolidation, and treatment facilities for use by
the department of agriculture to enhance the efficient and safe movement of
imported and exported marine cargo, to include food [safety] and food security guidelines and standards. [L 2011, c 202,
§3]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next